Maine, session 132, LD583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Provides a one-time appropriation for the Maine Emergency Medical Services
Community Grant Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Page 1 - 132LR1958(06)